Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.080

Fresh fruits—Culls—Basket markings—Designation on bills of lading, invoices, etc.

It is unlawful for any person to sell for fresh consumption any fresh fruits classified as culls under the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder unless such fruit is packed in one-half bushel or one bushel wooden baskets ring faced, with the fruit in the ring face representative of the size and quality of the fruit in such baskets. The baskets shall be lidded and the words "cull" including the kind of fruit and variety must appear on the top and side of each basket and on any label in clear and legible letters at least two and one-half inches high. Every bill of lading, invoice, memorandum, and document referring to the fruit shall designate them as culls.

[ 1998 c 154 s 6; 1963 c 122 s 8.]